Washington statutes.
RCW 19.184.060

Action for damages—Pecuniary loss doubled—Costs, disbursements, attorneys' fees, equitable relief.

In addition to pursuing another remedy, a consumer may bring an action to recover damages caused by a violation of this chapter. The court shall award a consumer who prevails in an action under this section twice the amount of pecuniary loss, together with costs, disbursements, reasonable attorneys' fees, and equitable relief that the court determines is appropriate.

[ 1994 c 104 s 6.]